Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 3. Inventory, Planning, and Classification.

Sec. 38.04.060.
Inventory.

The commissioner shall prepare and maintain on a continuing basis an inventory of all state land and water and their resource and other values, giving priority to areas of potential settlement, economic development, and critical environmental concern. This inventory shall be kept current so as to reflect changes in conditions and to identify new and emerging resource and other values.

The commissioner’s inventory must include land and water under interagency assignment of land management authority and land and water proposed for such an assignment. That land and water must be reviewed at regular intervals to analyze current and proposed uses as these uses relate to alternative uses for all or part of the land and to determine the uses which best provide for the public interest.

As funds and manpower are made available, the commissioner shall provide local and federal governments and major private landowners with data from the inventory for the purpose of planning and managing the uses of land in proximity to state land.

History.

(§ 5 ch 181 SLA 1978)

Sec. 38.04.062.
Identification of state submerged land.

Except as provided in (f) of this section, the state owns all submerged land underlying navigable water to which title passed to the state at the time the state achieved statehood under the equal footing doctrine or 43 U.S.C. 1301 — 1315 (Submerged Lands Act of 1953).

The commissioner shall compile, maintain, and make public a list and map of all water in the state that the commissioner, the United States Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management, or a state or federal court determines was navigable water at the time the state achieved statehood. The submerged land underlying that navigable water shall be included in the inventory of state land prepared under AS

38.04.060

.

The commissioner shall also maintain and make public a list of all water in the state that the commissioner determines, in consultation with the commissioner of fish and game, was nonnavigable at the time the state achieved statehood.

Water not included on the lists described in (b) or (c) of this section is not considered either navigable or nonnavigable until the commissioner has made a determination as to its navigability at the time the state achieved statehood. In addition, the commissioner may make corrections and alterations to the lists described in (b) and (c) of this section to maintain the accuracy of each list.

A determination made by the commissioner under this section

does not create an interest in or right of entry onto any real property that does not otherwise exist under state law;

may not be recorded; and

does not constitute final agency action.

Submerged land that the state conveyed under AS

38.05.820

and

38.05.825

is not subject to the state’s assertion of ownership under (a) of this section.

In this section,

“navigable water” means water that, at the time the state achieved statehood, was used, or was susceptible of being used, in its ordinary condition as a highway for commerce over which trade and travel were or could have been conducted in the customary modes of trade and travel on water; the use or potential use does not need to have been without difficulty, extensive, or long and continuous;

“nonnavigable water” means surface water that was not navigable water at the time the state achieved statehood.

History.

(§ 2 ch 42 SLA 2004)

Sec. 38.04.065.
Land use planning and classification.

Except as provided in (d) and (h) of this section, the commissioner shall, with local governmental and public involvement under AS

38.05.945

, adopt, maintain, and, when appropriate, revise regional land use plans that provide for the use and management of state-owned land.

In the adoption and revision of regional and site-specific land use plans, the commissioner shall

use and observe the principles of multiple use and sustained yield;

consider physical, economic, and social factors affecting the area and involve other agencies and the public in achieving a systematic interdisciplinary approach;

give priority to planning and classification in areas of potential settlement, renewable and nonrenewable resource development, and critical environmental concern;

rely, to the extent that it is available, on the inventory of the state land, its resources, and other values;

consider present and potential uses of state land;

consider the supply, resources, and present and potential use of land under other ownership within the area of concern;

plan for compatible surface and mineral land use classifications; and

provide for meaningful participation in the planning process by affected local governments, state and federal agencies, adjacent landowners, and the general public.

The commissioner shall adopt regional land use plans for state land. Each regional land use plan must identify and delineate

areas of settlement and settlement impact, where land must be classified for various private uses, renewable and nonrenewable resource development, and for public recreation, open space, and other public uses desirable in and around settlement; and

areas that must be retained in state ownership and planned and classified for various uses and purposes under AS

38.04.015

.

The commissioner may adopt as a land use plan a comprehensive plan adopted by a municipality having planning and zoning powers or a land management plan adopted by another governmental entity if the commissioner determines that the plan adequately recognizes and protects state interests. A decision to adopt the plan must be preceded by public hearings in affected and interested communities and by a draft decision, available for public review, that describes the state’s interests and how the state will implement the plan.

Land shall be classified as provided in AS

38.05.300

.

Each decision about the location of easements and rights-of-way, other than for minor access, shall be integrated with land use planning and classification.

Each land use plan adopted by the commissioner under this section shall be consistent with municipal land use plans to the maximum extent determined consistent with the state interests and the purposes of this chapter.

Before the commissioner adopts a regional land use plan, a land classification may be made on the basis of a site-specific land use plan. After adoption of a regional land use plan, land classifications shall be made under the plan.

An oil and gas lease sale or gas only lease sale is not subject to this section. Oil and gas lease sales and gas only lease sales are subject to the planning process established under AS

38.05.180

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 181 SLA 1978; am § 8 ch 113 SLA 1981; am § 93 ch 6 SLA 1984; am §§ 1 — 7 ch 75 SLA 1987; am § 3 ch 1 FSSLA 1996; am § 3 ch 20 SLA 1997; am § 8 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 9 ch 49 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For forest land use plans, see AS

38.05.112

; for forest management plans, see AS

41.17.230

.

Administrative Code. —

For land planning and classification, see 11 AAC 55.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 16, ch. 75, SLA 1987, provides that “[l]and that was classified for disposal or other purposes before August 29, 1986 remains subject to the classification order in effect on that date until the land is reclassified under AS

38.04.065

, as amended by secs. 1 — 7 of this Act (ch. 75, SLA 1987), and AS

38.05.300

.”

Section 17, ch. 75, SLA 1987 provides that “[a] land management and disposal decision, including a disposal under AS

38.05.057

, AS 38.08, or AS 38.09, or a commercial agricultural project under AS

38.05.020(b)(6)

, made before June 16, 1987, under a classification order under AS

38.05.300

is valid, notwithstanding the adoption of the classification order before the adoption of the regional land use plan, if other requirements of law were met.”

On June 7, 1996, the enactment of CSSB 162(FIN) (Nineteenth Legislature, Second Session), designated as ch. 1, FSSLA 1996, became the subject of a lawsuit relating to the legislative override of the governor’s veto of that bill. On April 16, 1997, the superior court issued a Final Declaratory Judgment stating that the governor’s veto of CSSB 162(FIN) “was not timely overridden by the Alaska Legislature” and that “CSSB 162(FIN) was not enacted into law.”

Honorable Tony Knowles v. Legislative Council

, No. 1JU 96-1276 CI (Sup. Ct. Apr. 16, 1997). On appeal, the Alaska Supreme Court vacated the judgment and directed the superior court to dismiss the action, concluding that the matter was an action brought in the name of the state against the legislature in violation of article III, sec. 16 of the Alaska Constitution.

Legislative Council v. Knowles

, 988 P.2d 604 (Alaska 1999).

The provisions of Section 3, ch. 20, SLA 1997, are given effect. These 1997 provisions are identical to the 1996 provisions of Section 3 of CSSB 162(FIN).

Sec. 38.04.070.
Management categories.

State land classified for uses and purposes involving retention in public ownership may be included in the following management categories:

state public reserve land: areas of public land to be managed for a wide variety of compatible uses and purposes in accordance with the principles of multiple use and sustained yield; land designated to this category may include, but need not be limited to, state forest reserves and state wildlife reserves as well as land classified for public purposes within settlement impact areas;

state parks: areas with special recreational, scenic, cultural, historical, wilderness, or similar values, to be managed primarily for the public use and enjoyment of these values;

state trails: a system of public historic or recreational trails;

wild and scenic rivers: a system of rivers and adjacent state land with special natural, scenic, and recreational values located within or adjacent to a wild and scenic river area managed as part of the national system of wild and scenic rivers in accordance with 16 U.S.C. 1271 — 1287 (Wild and Scenic Rivers Act);

state public domain: land within areas designated on regional plans as settlement and settlement impact which are not part of the management categories listed in (1) — (4) of this section; through classification, this land may be made available for private use, settlement, and development as well as for public uses associated with settlement and development.

History.

(§ 5 ch 181 SLA 1978)